th: สีเปลือกไข่: สีน้ำเงิน; สีน้ำตาล; ผสม; ลายจุด; สีขาว; อื่นๆ
nb: Eggeskallfarge: Blå; Brun; Blandet; Spettet; Hvit; Annet
vi: Màu vỏ trứng: Màu xanh dương; Màu nâu; Hỗn hợp; Lốm đốm; Màu trắng; Khác
hu: Tojáshéj szín: Kék; Barna; Vegyes; Pöttyös; Fehér; Egyéb
pt-PT: casca de ovo: Azul; Castanho; Misto; Com pintas; Branco; Outro
lt-LT: Kiaušinio lukšto spalva: Mėlyna; Ruda; Įvairių spalvų; Taškuota; Balta; Kita
fr: Couleur de la coquille des œufs: Bleu; Marron; Mixte; Tacheté; Blanc; Autre
nl: Eierschaal kleur: Blauw; Bruin; Gemengd; Gespikkeld; Wit; Overige
sv: Äggskalfärg: Blå; Brun; Blandad; Fläckig; Vit; Övrigt
en: Eggshell color: Blue; Brown; Mixed; Speckled; White; Other
bg-BG: Цвят на яйчена черупка: Син; Кафяв; Смесен; На петънца; Бял; Друг
pl: Kolor skorupki jaj: Niebieski; Brązowy; Mieszany; Nakrapiany; Biały; Inny
sl-SI: Barva jajčne lupine: Modra; Rjava; Mešana; Pikčasta; Bela; Drugo
ro-RO: Culoare cojii de ou: Albastru; Maro; Mixt; Pestriț; Alb; Altele
cs: Barva vaječné skořápky: Modrá; Hnědá; Smíšená; Kropenatá; Bílá; Jiné
de: Eierschalenfarbe: Blau; Braun; Gemischt; Gesprenkelt; Weiß; Sonstige
fi: Munankuoren väri: Sininen; Ruskea; Sekavärinen; Täplikäs; Valkoinen; Muu
ru: Цвет скорлупы: Синий; Коричневый; Смешанный; В крапинку; Белый; Другое
ko: 계란 껍질 색상: 파란색; 갈색; 혼합색; 얼룩무늬; 흰색; 기타
da: Æggeskallens farve: Blå; Brun; Blandet; Spættet; Hvid; Andet
it: Colore guscio d'uovo: Blu; Marrone; Misto; Maculato; Bianco; Altro
es: Color de la cáscara de huevo: Azul; Marrón; Mixto; Moteado; Blanco; Otro
hr-HR: Boja ljuske jajeta: Plava; Smeđa; Miješano; Pjegava; Bijela; Ostalo
pt-BR: Casca de ovo: Azul; Marrom; Misto; Pintalgado; Branco; Outro
sk-SK: Farba vaječnej škrupiny: Modrá; Hnedá; Zmiešaná; Škvrnitá; Biela; Iná
el: Χρώμα κελύφους αυγού: Μπλε; Καφέ; Μικτό; Με στίγματα; Λευκό; Άλλο
tr: Yumurta kabuğu rengi: Mavi; Kahverengi; Karışık; Benekli; Beyaz; Diğer
zh-CN: 蛋壳颜色: 蓝色; 棕色; 混合色; 带斑点; 白色; 其他
zh-TW: 蛋殼顏色: 藍色; 棕色; 混合; 斑點; 白色; 其他
ja: 卵の殻の色: 青; 茶色; 混合; 斑点入り; 白; その他